Washington statutes.
RCW 9.86.010

"Flag," etc., defined.

The words flag, standard, color, ensign or shield, as used in this chapter, shall include any flag, standard, color, ensign or shield, or copy, picture or representation thereof, made of any substance or represented or produced thereon, and of any size, evidently purporting to be such flag, standard, color, ensign or shield of the United States or of this state, or a copy, picture or representation thereof.

[ 1919 c 107 s 1; RRS s 2675-1.]